Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.200

Small works roster or purchase contracts—Listing of contracts awarded required.

Any local government using the uniform process established in RCW 39.04.190 to award contracts for purchases must post a list of the contracts awarded under that process at least once every two months. Any state agency or local government using the small works roster process established in RCW 39.04.151 through 39.04.154 to award contracts for construction, building, renovation, remodeling, alteration, repair, or improvement of real property must make available a list of the contracts awarded under that process at least once every year. The list shall contain the name of the contractor or vendor awarded the contract, the amount of the contract, a brief description of the type of work performed or items purchased under the contract, and the date it was awarded. The list shall also state the location where the bid quotations for these contracts are available for public inspection.

[ 2023 c 395 s 27; 2000 c 138 s 103; 1993 c 198 s 3; 1991 c 363 s 111.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Purpose—Part headings not law—2000 c 138: See notes following RCW 39.04.010.

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.